Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-407
Recording determination of terminal condition and declaration.

When the attending physician has knowledge of a declaration and, after personal examination, has determined that a declarant is in a terminal condition or in a persistent vegetative state, the attending physician shall record the diagnosis, determination, and the terms of the declaration, in writing, in the declarant's medical record.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 7.